Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5709.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-20-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-20 entitled "Mail Ballots"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-20-9. Application by permanently disabled or incapacitated voters and nursing
home residents. Application to be placed on the permanent mail ballot application list.
(a) A voter who is indefinitely confined because of physical illness or infirmity or is
disabled for an indefinite period or who is a long-term resident in a nursing home, may, by signing
an affidavit to that effect an application, may request that a mail ballot application be sent to him
or her automatically for every election. The affidavit form application and instructions shall be
prescribed by the secretary of state, and furnished upon request to any elector by each local board
of canvassers. The envelope containing the mail ballot application shall be clearly marked as not
forwardable. If any elector is no longer an eligible voter indefinitely confined or is no longer
residing in a nursing home, he or she shall notify the clerk of the local board of canvassers of this
fact. The clerk local board shall remove the name of any voter from the mailing list established
under this section upon receipt of reliable information that a voter no longer qualifies for the
service. The voter shall be notified of the action within five (5) days after the board takes the action.
(b) The affidavit form application and instructions prescribed in this section shall be mailed
to the applicant along with a stamped return envelope addressed to the local boards of canvassers.
The secretary of state may process applications pursuant to this section through the online mail
ballot application portal established by § 17-20-2.3.

(c) For purposes of this section, “nursing home” refers to facilities defined and licensed by
the department of health. “Long-term” excludes any residents temporarily residing in such a facility
for rehabilitation.
(d) The secretary of state shall maintain a list in the central voter registration system of all
voters who automatically receive applications for mail ballots, pursuant to this section.
(e) [Expires December 31, 2025.] Eligible disabled voters shall be entitled to electronically
receive and return their mail ballot, using the same electronic transmission system as that used by
voters covered by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (UOCAVA). This
electronic process shall satisfy the federal Rehabilitation Act, section 508 concerning accessibility
standards.
(f) [Expires December 31, 2025.] For purposes of this section, “eligible disabled voter”
means a person with disabilities eligible to vote who is incapacitated to such an extent that it would
be an undue hardship to vote at the polls because of illness, mental or physical disability, blindness,
or a serious impairment of mobility.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001962
========
LC001962 - Page 2 of 3